Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2929
Program disease activity or surveillance, defined.

Program disease activity or surveillance means determining the presence, control, eradication, surveillance, or monitoring of program diseases and may include, but is not limited to, testing, taking of diagnostic samples, treating, vaccinating, monitoring, or surveillance of any animals, affected animals, or suspected affected animals or any premises, affected premises, or suspected affected premises.

Laws 2020, LB344, § 29.